Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-1,109
Insolvent banks; claims; certificate of allowance; assignment; payments endorsed on certificate.

Upon the allowance of a claim against an insolvent bank, the director shall, upon request of the claimant, issue and deliver to the claimant a certificate of indebtedness showing the amount of the claim, the date of the allowance thereof, and whether such claim is one having priority of payment or is a general claim. Any assignment of a claim or certificate of indebtedness shall be filed with the director and shall not be binding until so filed. Upon payment of any dividend on a claim, evidenced by a certificate of indebtedness, such certificate shall be presented and an endorsement of such payment shall be made thereon.

Laws 1929, c. 38, § 22, p. 167;

C.S.1929, § 8-1,101;

Laws 1933, c. 18, § 65, p. 169;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 8-1,101;

R.S.1943, § 8-195;

Laws 1963, c. 29, § 109, p. 180.